Illinois, session 104th, SB3979.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 5Section 4-620 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/4-620 new)7    Sec. 4-620. Regulatory Takings Assessment.8    (a) All decarbonization pilots, pathways, or 9infrastructure plans under a Future of Gas proceeding pursuant 10to the final Order of the Commission in Docket No. 24-0158 11shall undergo a Regulatory Takings Assessment prior to 12approval. The Assessment shall be conducted by an independent 13third party and evaluated and confirmed by intervenors and 14stakeholders. The Assessment shall evaluate the following: 15        (1) whether proposed mandates, such as full 16    electrification or renewable natural gas adoption, deprive 17    property owners, public utilities, or customers of the 18    economic use of existing gas infrastructure or appliances 19    without just compensation;20        (2) potential stranded asset values, including 21    recovery mechanisms for non-migrating customers; and22        (3) mitigation strategies, such as opt-out provisions 23    or market-based transitions.   SB3979- 2 -LRB104 19037 AAS 32482 b1    (b) A mandate in a decarbonization pilot, pathway, or 2infrastructure plan shall not be approved if the mandate risks 3creating a taking without compensation that is equivalent to 4at least 80% of depreciated asset value.5    (c) The Commission shall coordinate with the Environmental 6Protection Agency to ensure the alignment of air pollution 7standards, as defined in Section 3.115 of the Environmental 8Protection Act, and shall require, by rule, uniform metrics 9across decarbonization pilots, pathways, and infrastructure 10plans, including bill impacts and equity analyses.11    (d) Rulemaking pursuant to this Section shall be completed 12by June 1, 2026 and rules adopted pursuant to this Section 13shall be applied to all Phase 2C proposals, as specified under 14the final Order of the Commission in Docket No. 24-0158.